North Carolina, session 2025, SB238.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of five hundred thirty thousand dollars ($530,000) in recurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to Edgecombe County Public Schools to be used to
provide at least one full-time, permanent school nurse in each public school in Edgecombe
County. Funds provided pursuant to this act shall supplement and not supplant any funds from
any source already provided for the same purposes.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one million six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($1,675,000)
in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to Pitt County Schools to be used
to provide at least one full-time, permanent school nurse in each public school in Pitt County.
Funds provided pursuant to this act shall supplement and not supplant any funds from any source
already provided for the same purposes.
SECTION 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
*S238-v-1*